Louisiana, session 2026, SB488.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:416.16.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§416.16.2. School Safety Drone Response Pilot Program
A.(1) The state Department of Education may establish a School Safety
Drone Response Pilot Program to evaluate the use of drone technology as a
supplement to existing school safety and law enforcement response protocols at
each city, parish, and other local public school.
(2) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
establish criteria for participation by each city, parish, and other local public
school.
(3) The department may choose a vendor to operate the pilot program
and provide the drone response technology.
B. The program shall be conducted as part of the crisis management and
response plan in accordance with the provisions of R.S. 17:416.16.
C. Each city, parish, and other local public school shall be eligible to
participate in the pilot program. The department shall select at least one but no
more than four schools to participate in the pilot program, based upon a first
come, first serve basis.
D. As a condition to participate in the program, a school shall provide
school mapping data to the vendor that is chosen by the department to operate
a drone safety program, subject to the provisions of R.S. 17:416.16.1. The
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 488 ENROLLED
vendor shall enter into a confidentiality agreement with the department, the
school, and the Louisiana Center for Safe Schools to provide strict
confidentiality with respect to the school's mapping data.
E. The department may accept grants or private funding to establish and
operate the pilot program.
F. The vendor that is selected to participate in the School Safety Drone
Response Pilot Program shall coordinate with the state Department of
Education, Louisiana State Police, and the Louisiana Sheriffs' Association with
respect to the drone operational training procedures related to responding to
school safety incidents. The coordination shall be used to enhance deconfliction
and situational awareness and ensure that compliance with all applicable law
enforcement training procedures are fulfilled in a unified emergency response
effort among state and local law enforcement officials and other first
responders.
G. Beginning December 31, 2027, the department shall submit an annual
report to the Senate Committee on Education and the House Committee on
Education as to the findings and effectiveness of the pilot program.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.